Hawaii statutes.
[§613-4] Annual report. The center
shall submit a report on its activities to the legislature at least twenty days
prior to the convening of each regular legislative session. [L 1989, c 346, pt
of §2; am L 1991, c 131, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next